Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-111
Interexchange service, defined.

Interexchange service means the access and transmission of communications between two or more local exchange areas, except for two-way switched communications between local exchanges that are grouped for extended area service.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 12.